Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 46 Pest Control Compact

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1, and Laws 2005, ch. 91, § 1, each enacted a chapter 46 in title 11. The chapter enacted by Laws 2005, ch. 91 has been redesignated as chapter 47 in title 11 at the direction of the legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

§ 11-46-101.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

§ 11-46-102.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

§ 11-46-103.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

§ 11-46-104.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

§ 11-46-105.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

§ 11-46-106.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

§ 11-46-107.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.